Washington statutes.
RCW 19.28.311

Electrical board.

There is hereby created an electrical board, consisting of fifteen members to be appointed by the governor with the advice of the director of labor and industries as herein provided. It shall be the purpose and function of the board to advise the director on all matters pertaining to the enforcement of this chapter including, but not limited to, standards of electrical and telecommunications installation, minimum inspection procedures, and the adoption of rules pertaining to the electrical inspection division: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That no rules shall be amended or repealed until the electrical board has first had an opportunity to consider any proposed amendments or repeals and had an opportunity to make recommendations to the director relative thereto. The members of the electrical board shall be selected and appointed as follows: One member shall be an employee or officer of a corporation or public agency generating or distributing electric power; one member must be an employee or officer of a facilities-based telecommunications service provider regulated by the Washington state utilities and transportation commission; three members shall be licensed electrical contractors: PROVIDED, That one of these members may be a representative of a trade association in the electrical industry; one member shall be a licensed telecommunications contractor; one member shall be an employee, or officer, or representative of a corporation or firm engaged in the business of manufacturing or distributing electrical and telecommunications materials, equipment, or devices; one member shall be a person with knowledge of the electrical industry, not related to the electrical industry, to represent the public; three members shall be certified electricians; one member shall be a telecommunications worker; one member shall be a licensed professional electrical engineer qualified to do business in the state of Washington and designated as a registered communications distribution designer; one member shall be an outside line worker; and one nonvoting member must be a building official from an incorporated city or town with an electrical inspection program established under RCW 19.28.141. The regular term of each member shall be four years: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, The original board shall be appointed on June 9, 1988, for the following terms: The first term of the member representing a corporation or public agency generating or distributing electric power shall serve four years; two members representing licensed electrical contractors shall serve three years; the member representing a manufacturer or distributor of electrical equipment or devices shall serve three years; the member representing the public and one member representing licensed electrical contractors shall serve two years; the three members selected as certified electricians shall serve for terms of one, two, and three years, respectively; the member selected as the licensed professional electrical engineer shall serve for one year. In appointing the original board, the governor shall give due consideration to the value of continuity in membership from predecessor boards. Thereafter, the governor shall appoint or reappoint board members for terms of four years and to fill vacancies created by the completion of the terms of the original members. When new positions are created, the governor may appoint the initial members to the new positions to staggered terms of one to three years. The governor shall also fill vacancies caused by death, resignation, or otherwise for the unexpired term of such members by appointing their successors from the same business classification. The same procedure shall be followed in making such subsequent appointments as is provided for the original appointments. The board, at this first meeting shall elect one of its members to serve as chair. Any person acting as the chief electrical inspector shall serve as secretary of the board during his or her tenure as chief state inspector. Meetings of the board shall be held at least quarterly in accordance with a schedule established by the board. Each member of the board shall receive compensation in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 which shall be paid out of the electrical license fund, upon vouchers approved by the director of labor and industries.

[ 2011 c 336 s 529; 2005 c 280 s 1; 2000 c 238 s 3; 1988 c 81 s 4; 1984 c 287 s 56; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 60; 1969 ex.s. c 71 s 1; 1963 c 207 s 5. Formerly RCW 19.28.065.]

NOTES:

Appointment to electrical board—2005 c 280: "The governor shall appoint the member representing outside line workers within ninety days after July 24, 2005." [ 2005 c 280 s 2.]

Severability—2000 c 238: See note following RCW 19.28.301.

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1984 c 287: See notes following RCW 43.03.220.

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.